src/morphology/stems/pronouns.lexc
LEXICON pronouns

minä:min PersSg1  "minä" ;
sinä:sin PersSg2  "sinä" ;
hän:hä PersSg3  "hän" ;
mö:m PersPl1  "me" ;
tö:t PersPl2  "te" ;
hö:h PersPl3  "he" ;
